sk-SK: Hmotnostný systém vlákna na prešívanie: Denier; Ne (anglické číslovanie bavlny); Nm (metrické číslovanie); Tex; Číslo etikety; Hmotnosť (wt); Iné
pl: System grubości nici do pikowania: Denier; Ne (angielska numeracja przędzy bawełnianej); Nm (numeracja metryczna); Tex; Numeracja etykietowa (Ticket); Grubość (wt); Inne
pt-PT: Sistema de classificação do peso da linha de acolchoar: Denier; Ne (título inglês do algodão); Nm (título métrico); Tex; Número de etiqueta; Peso (wt); Outro
it: Sistema di pesi thread da quilting: Denari; Ne (titolo inglese del cotone); Nm (titolo metrico); Tex; Numero etichetta; Peso (wt); Altro
zh-CN: 绗缝线号制: 丹尼尔 (Denier); Ne（英制棉纱支数）; Nm（公制支数）; Tex; 标签支数; 重量 (wt); 其他
hr-HR: Sustav težine konca za prošivanje: Denier; Ne (engleski broj pamučnog konca); Nm (metrički broj); Tex; Oznaka debljine; Težina (wt); Ostalo
en: Quilting thread weight system: Denier; Ne (English cotton count); Nm (metric count); Tex; Ticket number; Weight (wt); Other
lt-LT: Skiautinių siūlo storio sistema: Denjė; Ne (angliškas medvilnės matas); Nm (metrinis matas); Teksas (Tex); Etiketės numeris; Svoris (wt); Kita
ko: 퀼팅실 굵기 체계: 데니어; Ne(영국 면사 번수); Nm(미터 번수); Tex; 티켓 번호; 중량(wt); 기타
th: ระบบน้ำหนักด้ายเย็บผ้าควิลท์: ดีเนียร์; Ne (ขนาดด้ายฝ้ายแบบอังกฤษ); Nm (ขนาดด้ายแบบเมตริก); Tex; เบอร์เส้นด้าย; น้ำหนัก (wt); อื่นๆ
fr: Système de titrage du fil à quilter: Denier; Ne (titrage anglais du coton); Nm (titrage métrique); Tex; Numéro d’étiquette; Poids (wt); Autre
zh-TW: 拼布線粗細系統: 丹尼; Ne (英制棉線支數); Nm (公制支數); Tex (特克斯); 票號 (Ticket number); 重量 (wt); 其他
cs: Systém váhového číslování prošívacích nití: Denier; Ne (anglický systém číslování bavlněných přízí); Nm (metrické číslování); Tex; Číslo etikety; Hmotnost (wt); Jiné
ro-RO: Sistemul de grosime al firului de matlasare: Denier; Ne (sistem englez pentru bumbac); Nm (sistem metric); Tex; Număr de etichetă (ticket number); Greutate (wt); Altele
tr: Kapitone iplik ağırlık sistemi: Denye; Ne (İngiliz pamuk ölçüsü); Nm (Metrik ölçü); Teks; Etiket numarası; Ağırlık (wt); Diğer
fi: Tikkauslangan vahvuus: Denier; Ne (englantilainen puuvillanumerointi); Nm (metrinen numerointi); Tex; Lankanumero; Paino (wt); Muu
ja: キルティング糸の太さ規格: デニール; Ne (英式綿番手); Nm (メートル番手); テックス; チケット番号; ウェイト (wt); その他
da: Quiltetrådvægtsystem: Denier; Ne (engelsk bomuldsnummering); Nm (metrisk nummering); Tex; Trådnummer; Vægt (wt); Andet
el: Σύστημα αρίθμησης πάχους κλωστής quilting: Denier; Ne (αγγλικό σύστημα μέτρησης βαμβακιού); Nm (μετρικό σύστημα); Tex; Αριθμός ετικέτας; Βάρος (wt); Άλλο
nb: Vektsystem for stikksømtråd: Denier; Ne (engelsk bomullsnummer); Nm (metrisk nummer); Tex; Trådnummer; Vekt (wt); Annet
bg-BG: Система за тегло на конец за капитониране: Дение; Ne (английска номерация на памук); Nm (метрична номерация); Текс; Номер на етикет; Тегло (wt); Друго
ru: Система измерения толщины нити для квилтинга: Денье; Ne (английский номер хлопка); Nm (метрический номер); Текс; Номер этикетки; Толщина (wt); Другое
hu: Steppelő cérna súlyrendszere: Denier; Ne (angol pamutszám); Nm (metrikus szám); Tex; Címkeszám; Súly (wt); Egyéb
vi: Hệ thống trọng lượng chỉ may chần: Denier; Ne (Chỉ số bông Anh); Nm (Chỉ số mét); Tex; Số ticket; Trọng lượng (wt); Khác
de: Gewichtssystem des Quiltgarns: Denier; Ne (Englische Baumwollnummer); Nm (Metrische Nummer); Tex; Ticketnummer; Gewicht (wt); Sonstige
es: Sistema de peso del hilo para acolchado: Denier; Ne (título inglés de algodón); Nm (número métrico); Tex; Número de etiqueta; Peso (wt); Otro
pt-BR: Linha para quilting sistema de peso: Denier; Ne (título de algodão inglês); Nm (título métrico); Tex; Número da etiqueta; Peso (wt); Outro
sl-SI: Sistem debeline sukanca za prešivanje: Denier; Ne (angleška številka preje); Nm (metrična številka preje); Tex; Številka sukanca; Teža (wt); Drugo
sv: Viktsystem för quiltningstråd: Denier; Ne (engelskt bomullsnummer); Nm (metriskt nummer); Tex; Grovleksnummer; Vikt (wt); Övrigt
nl: Quiltdraad gewichtssysteem: Denier; Ne (Engelse katoentelling); Nm (metrische telling); Tex; Ticketnummer; Gewicht (wt); Overig